Maryland, session 2026, HB0505.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–118.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “SCHOOL” MEANS A PUBLIC OR NONPUBLIC
ELEMENTARY OR SECONDARY SCHOOL.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb0505*

HOUSE BILL 505
(B) FOR THE PURPOSE OF A STUDENT TRANSFERRING SCHOOLS, IF A
RECEIVING SCHOOL’S REQUEST FOR THE OFFICIAL ACADEMIC TRANSCRIPT AND
RECORDS OF THE TRANSFERRING STUDENT ARE DENIED BY THE SENDING SCHOOL
DUE TO A DISPUTE BETWEEN THE SENDING SCHOOL AND THE STUDENT, THE
RECEIVING SCHOOL SHALL ACCEPT THE FOLLOWING DOCUMENTATION FOR THE
SOLE PURPOSE OF ALLOWING THE STUDENT TO CONTINUE THE STUDENT’S
EDUCATION PROGRAM AT THE RECEIVING SCHOOL:
(1) AN UNOFFICIAL TRANSCRIPT;
(2) REPORT CARDS PROVIDED BY THE STUDENT;
(3) STANDARDIZED SUBJECT–RELEVANT STANDARDIZED TEST
SCORE REPORTS PROVIDED BY THE STUDENT; OR
(4) COPIES OF AWARDS AND HONORS DOCUMENTS;
(5) UNOFFICIAL ADVANCED PLACEMENT SCORE REPORTS OR
INTERNATIONAL BACCALAUREATE DIPLOMA PROGRAMME EXAMINATION
RESULTS; OR
(6) ANY OTHER UNOFFICIAL RECORD OR COPY OF A DOCUMENT
REGARDING THE TRANSFERRING STUDENT’S ACADEMIC RECORD THAT PROVIDES
EVIDENCE OF THE STUDENT’S COURSE OF STUDY AND RECORD OF PROGRESS AT THE
SENDING SCHOOL.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.